Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1802.   Appeal to Utah Court of Appeals -- Jurisdiction of district court.

(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2), a person who receives an adverse decision, or a procurement unit, may appeal a decision of a procurement appeals panel to the Utah Court of Appeals within seven days after the day on which the decision is issued.

(b)  A person who receives an adverse decision in a protest relating to a legislative procurement unit, a judicial procurement unit, a local government procurement unit, or a public transit district may appeal the decision to the Utah Court of Appeals within seven days after the day on which the decision is issued.

(2)  A procurement unit may not appeal the decision of a procurement appeals panel, unless the appeal is:

(a)  recommended by the protest officer involved; and

(b)  except for a procurement unit that is not represented by the attorney general's office, approved by the attorney general.

(3)  The Utah Court of Appeals:

(a)  shall consider the appeal as an appellate court;

(b)  may not hear the matter as a trial de novo; and

(c)  may not overturn a finding or decision of the protest officer or a procurement appeals panel, unless the finding or decision is arbitrary and capricious or clearly erroneous.

(4)  The Utah Court of Appeals is encouraged to:

(a)  give an appeal made under Subsection (1) priority; and

(b)  consider the appeal and render a decision in an expeditious manner.

(5)  The district court shall have original jurisdiction in a cause of action between a contractor and a procurement unit for any cause of action that arises under, or in relation to, an existing contract between the contractor and a procurement unit.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

